Hawaii statutes.
§111-9 Rules and regulations. The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may adopt and amend rules and
regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter and may adopt all or any
part of applicable federal rules and regulations which are necessary or
desirable to obtain federal assistance in making payments hereunder. [L 1970, c
166, §9; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b);
am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next